Utah statutes.
58-69-503.   Penalty for unlawful conduct.

(1)  Any person who violates the unlawful conduct provisions of Subsection 58-1-501(1)(a) and Section 58-69-501 with regard to the practice of dentistry is guilty of a third degree felony.

(2)  Any person who violates the unlawful conduct provisions of Subsection 58-1-501(1)(a) with regard to the practice of dental hygiene is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

